Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-12,217
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate all procedures and rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Rural Projects Act.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 23.